Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

30-11-101. Powers of counties.

Each organized county within the state is a body corporate and politic and as such is empowered for the following purposes:

To sue and be sued;

To purchase and hold real and personal property for the use of the county, and acquire lands sold for taxes, as provided by law;

To sell, convey, or exchange any real or personal property owned by the county and make such order respecting the same as may be deemed conducive to the interests of the inhabitants; and to lease any real or personal property, either as lessor or lessee, together with any facilities thereon, when deemed by the board of county commissioners to be in the best interests of the county and its inhabitants;

To make all contracts and do all other acts in relation to the property and concerns necessary to the exercise of its corporate or administrative powers. Any such contract may by its terms exceed one year and shall be binding upon the parties thereto as to all of its rights, duties, and obligations.

To exercise such other and further powers as may be especially conferred by law;

To develop, maintain, and operate mass transportation systems, which power shall be vested either individually in the board of county commissioners or jointly with other political subdivisions or governmental entities formed pursuant to the provisions of part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S. Except as provided in paragraph (j) of this subsection (1), this provision shall not apply to any county or portion thereof encompassed by the regional transportation district as formed pursuant to the provisions of article 9 of title 32, C.R.S. Counties, by ordinance adopted, administered, and enforced in accordance with part 4 of article 15 of this title, shall have the authority: To fix, maintain, and revise passenger fees, rates, and charges, and terms and conditions for such systems; to prescribe the method of development, maintenance, and operation of such mass transportation systems; and to receive contributions, gifts, or other support from public and private entities to defray the operating costs of such systems.

To provide for the payment of construction, installation, operation, and maintenance of street lighting by ordinance adopted, administered, and enforced in accordance with part 4 of article 15 of this title and to assess, either in whole or in part, the cost of constructing, installing, operating, and maintaining such street lighting against the property in the vicinity of such street lighting in proportion to the frontage of the property abutting the road, street, or alley where such street lighting is so constructed, installed, operated, and maintained;

To enter into contracts with the executive director of the department of corrections pursuant to section 16-11-308.5, C.R.S., for the placement of persons under the custody of the executive director in county jails or adult detention centers;

To dispose of abandoned personal property acquired by an elected county official or county employee in performing official duties. Said personal property may be disposed of only after the exercise of due diligence to determine the owner of such personal property. Such personal property may be sold, discarded, or used for county purposes as the board of county commissioners deems to be in the best interests of the county.

For any county located in whole or in part within the boundaries of the regional transportation district, to provide transit services in cooperation with and pursuant to consultation with the board of directors of the district. For purposes of this paragraph (j), "county" means any county or city and county.

To coordinate, pursuant to 43 U.S.C. sec. 1712, the "National Environmental Policy Act of 1969", 42 U.S.C. sec. 4321 et seq., 40 U.S.C. sec. 3312, 16 U.S.C. sec. 530, 16 U.S.C. sec. 1604, and 40 CFR parts 1500 to 1508, with the United States secretary of the interior and the United States secretary of agriculture to develop land management plans that address hazardous fuel removal and other forest management practices, water development and conservation measures, watershed protection, the protection of air quality, public utilities protection, and private property protection on federal lands within such county's jurisdiction;

To conduct or participate in forest health projects as defined in section 37-95-103 (4.9) within and outside the boundaries of the county.

Counties have the authority to adopt and enforce ordinances and resolutions regarding health, safety, and welfare issues as otherwise prescribed by law. In addition to any other enforcement or collection method authorized by law, if a county passes an ordinance or resolution of which a violation would be a class 2 petty offense, the county may elect to apply the penalty assessment procedure set forth in section 16-2-201, C.R.S., and may adopt a graduated fine schedule for multiple offenses. If a specified offense would be an unclassified misdemeanor, a county may elect to downgrade the offense to a class 2 petty offense and apply the penalty assessment procedure under circumstances deemed appropriate and prescribed by the county in an ordinance or resolution.

Source:

G.L.

§ 428.

G.S.

§ 521.

R.S. 08:

§ 1177.

C.L.

§ 8658.

CSA:

C. 45, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-1.

L. 73:

pp. 465, 466, §§ 1, 1.

L. 79:

(1)(g) added, p. 1150, § 2, effective April 25.

L. 88:

(1)(h) added, pp. 677, 711, §§ 5, 12, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(f) and (1)(g) R&RE, p. 1446, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(i) added, p. 967, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 93:

(1)(h) amended, p. 407, § 6, effective April 19.

L. 2002:

(1)(f) amended and (1)(j) added, p. 733, § 3, effective August 7; (1)(f) amended and (1)(j) added, p. 713, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(1)(k) added, p. 1036, § 10, effective April 17.

L. 2008:

(2) added, p. 57, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended and (1)(l) added, (HB 21-1008), ch.159, p. 905, § 2, effective May 20.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act enacting subsection (1)(k), see section 1 of chapter 145, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

30-11-102. Property of county.

Any real or personal property conveyed to any county shall be deemed the property of such county.

Source:

G.L.

§ 429.

G.S.

§ 522.

R.S. 08:

§ 1178.

C.L.

§ 8659.

CSA:

C. 45, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-2.

30-11-103. Commissioners to exercise powers of county.

The powers of a county as a body politic and corporate shall be exercised by a board of county commissioners therefor.

Source:

G.L.

§ 430.

G.S.

§ 523.

R.S. 08:

§ 1179.

C.L.

§ 8660.

CSA:

C. 45, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-3.

30-11-103.5. County petitions and referred measures.

The procedures for placing an issue or question on the ballot by a petition of the electors of a county that is pursuant to statute or the state constitution or that a board of county commissioners may refer to a vote of the electors pursuant to statute or the state constitution shall, to the extent no such procedures are prescribed by statute, charter, or the state constitution, follow as nearly as practicable the procedures for municipal initiatives and referred measures under part 1 of article 11 of title 31, C.R.S. The county clerk and recorder shall resolve any questions about the applicability of the procedures in part 1 of article 11 of title 31, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1766, § 58, effective July 1.

30-11-104. County buildings - acquisition of land or buildings by eminent domain authorized.

Each county, at its own expense, shall provide a suitable courthouse, a sufficient jail, and other necessary county buildings and keep them in repair.

For any penal institution that begins operations on or after August 30, 1999, that is operated by or under contract with a county, the county may establish standards relating to space requirements, furnishing requirements, required special use areas or special management housing, and environmental condition requirements, including but not limited to standards pertaining to light, ventilation, temperature, and noise level. If a county does not adopt standards pursuant to this paragraph (b), the penal institution operated by or under contract with the county shall be subject to the standards adopted by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-1.5-101 (1)(i), C.R.S. In establishing such standards, the county is strongly encouraged to consult with national associations that specialize in policies relating to correctional institutions.

Each county has the power to acquire, by eminent domain, land or buildings, or both, for the provision of court and district attorney facilities, jails, and other necessary facilities specifically related thereto. Any acquisitions by eminent domain shall be made in the manner authorized for cities and towns as set forth in article 6 of title 38, C.R.S.

Source:

G.L.

§ 431.

G.S.

§ 524.

R.S. 08:

§ 1180.

C.L.

§ 8661.

CSA:

C. 45, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-4.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1203, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 803, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(1)(b) amended, p. 714, § 56, effective July 1.

30-11-104.1. Financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements.

In order to provide for financing of a public park, a public trail, a public golf course, or public open space, or a courthouse, jail, or other county building or equipment used, or to be used, for governmental purposes, or for financing of a forest health project as defined in section 37-95-103 (4.9), any county is authorized to enter into financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements.

Such agreements may include an option to purchase, transfer, and acquire title to such property and the improvements thereon, if any, within a period not exceeding the useful life of such property and any improvements, but in no case exceeding thirty years.

The obligation under any such agreements may only be from year to year and may not constitute a mandatory charge or requirement in any ensuing budget year.

The obligation to make payments under such an agreement and the obligation to pay other charges incident to any such agreement shall not constitute or give rise to an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional, statutory, or home rule charter debt limitation.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1446, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1233, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 99:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 166, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1008), ch. 159, p. 906, § 3, effective May 20; (1) and (3) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2054, § 68, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by HB 21-1008 and HB 21-1316 were harmonized.

30-11-104.2. Tax exemption.

Property financed pursuant to the provisions of section 30-11-104.1 shall be exempt from taxation so long as it is used for governmental purposes.

A courthouse, jail, or other county building subject to financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements in force on May 29, 1981, shall be accorded the same tax-exempt status as a courthouse, jail, or other county building financed by such agreements entered into after such date.

Equipment subject to financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements in force on May 25, 1983, shall be accorded the same tax-exempt status as equipment financed by such agreements entered into after such date.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1446, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 1233, § 2, effective May 25.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2055, § 69, effective July 1.

30-11-105. Title of suits by or against county.

In all suits or proceedings by or against a county, the name in which the county shall sue or be sued shall be, "The board of county commissioners of the county of ................"; but this provision shall not prevent county officers, when authorized by law, from suing in their name of office for the benefit of the county.

Source:

G.L.

§ 432.

G.S.

§ 525.

R.S. 08:

§ 1181.

C.L.

§ 8662.

CSA:

C. 45, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-5.

30-11-105.1. Standing - contesting constitutionality of a statute.

In addition to any other powers prescribed in this part 1, any county or county officer shall have standing in district court to defend any action brought against such county or officer by contesting the constitutionality of a statute underlying such action and affecting the rights, status, or other legal relations of such county or county officer or directing the performance of, defining, or prescribing the duties or responsibilities of such county officer.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 73, § 1, effective March 26.

30-11-106. Process served on clerk - clerk to notify board.

In all legal proceedings against the county, process shall be served on the clerk of the board of county commissioners, and when such suit or proceeding is commenced, it is the duty of the clerk to notify the county attorney thereof, and to lay before the board of county commissioners, at their next meeting, all the information he may have in regard to such suit or proceeding.

Source:

G.L.

§ 433.

G.S.

§ 526.

R.S. 08:

§ 1182.

C.L.

§ 8663.

CSA:

C. 45, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-6.

30-11-107. Powers of the board - repeal.

The board of county commissioners of each county has power at any meeting:

To make such orders concerning the property belonging to the county as it deems expedient;

To examine and settle all accounts of the receipts and expenses of the county, to examine and settle and allow all accounts chargeable against the county, and, when so settled, to issue county orders therefor as provided by law;

To build and keep in repair county buildings and cause the same to be insured in the name of the county treasurer for the benefit of the county and, in case there are no county buildings, to provide suitable rooms for county purposes;

To apportion and order the levying of taxes as provided by law; except that, for purposes of the application of any occupational privilege tax, oil and gas wells and their associated production facilities shall not be considered a business or occupation subject to such tax; and

To contract loans in the name and for the benefit of the county for the purpose of erecting necessary public buildings and making or repairing public roads or bridges, when such loans have been authorized by a vote of the legal voters of the county;

To represent the county and have the care of the county property and the management of the business and concerns of the county in all cases where no other provisions are made by law;

To set off, organize, and change the boundaries of precincts in their respective counties and to designate and number such precincts in accordance with sections 1-5-101 and 1-5-101.5, C.R.S.;

To establish one or more voting places in each election precinct, as the convenience of the inhabitants may require;

To lay out, alter, or discontinue any road running into or through such county and also to perform such other duties respecting roads as may be required by law;

To grant such licenses and perform such other duties as are or may be prescribed by law;

To acquire land for, lay out, construct, maintain, and repair airports and landing strips for aircraft, to enter into leases, and to fix and collect charges or fees for the use of such airports and landing strips;

To provide in the county budget for dumping grounds within the county to be used for such purposes as may be prescribed by the board;

To enter into agreements with any municipality for the joint use and occupation of public buildings. The consideration to be paid for such use and occupation shall be paid each year out of current revenues which shall be appropriated annually, and any agreement to make such annual payment shall not be considered or held to be creation of an indebtedness of the county within any constitutional or statutory limitation.

To negotiate with the board or boards of county commissioners of another county or counties, and with the board of governors of the Colorado state university system of Colorado state university, for agricultural extension service to be furnished such counties, and to be financed on a pro rata share by the counties receiving such service;

To create, by resolution duly adopted, the office of county manager, or administrative assistant to the board of county commissioners, or county budget officer, or any other such office as may, in its judgment, be required for the efficient management of the business and concerns of the county. When so created, the board has power to make appointments to such offices, to prescribe the duties to be performed by such appointees, to fix the compensation to be paid to such appointees, and to pay the same from the county general fund. Any persons appointed to such offices shall serve at the pleasure of the board of county commissioners.

To cooperate with other counties and with the state forester in the organization and training of rural fire fighting groups, payment for the operation and maintenance of fire fighting equipment and in sharing the cost of suppressing fires;

Repealed.

To purchase all necessary uniforms of the county sheriff, undersheriff, and deputies of the county; but no such uniforms shall be supplied to those persons deputized to perform particular acts, and all such uniforms shall be and remain the property of the county;

To organize, own, operate, control, direct, manage, contract for, or furnish ambulance service;

To provide in the county budget for services for the aged, including but not limited to social and recreational services, medical services, transportation, and homemaker services;

To appropriate moneys from sources other than ad valorem taxes to multijurisdictional housing authorities or housing authorities established under part 5 of article 4 of title 29, C.R.S., from the county general fund;

To set, by resolution duly adopted or by the method provided in the charter of a home rule county, mileage for all county officers, employees, and agents in an amount not less than twenty cents per mile nor more than a rate per mile equal to the standard mileage rate allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 162, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder, for each mile actually and necessarily traveled while on official county business;

To expend moneys or make assessments pursuant to paragraph (z) of this subsection (1) for the maintenance of drainage structures and facilities and to accept dedicated or deeded drainage easements or drainageway tracts as county property once drainage structures and facilities on such easements or tracts have been completed and found to meet county specifications and standards;

To provide a job diversion program directing persons making application for or receiving assistance under the Colorado works program, as described in part 7 of article 2 of title 26, C.R.S., into bona fide public or private sector employment;

To expend moneys or make assessments pursuant to paragraph (z) of this subsection (1) for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, or extension of drainage facilities within the unincorporated or incorporated areas of the county and to acquire, by gift, purchase, lease, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, all lands, easements, or rights in land which are necessary in connection with such construction, reconstruction, improvement, or extension. Drainage facilities shall not be provided in any area which is within an existing drainage district organized or created pursuant to law without the approval of such district.

To enter into a contract with the state telecommunications director pursuant to the provisions of section 24-37.5-502 (3), C.R.S., for the providing of teleconferencing facilities and services between the county and any other county, city and county, or state agency to be used for teleconferencing of hearings relating to any person in the custody of the county.

This subsection (1)(x) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

To expend moneys or make assessments pursuant to paragraph (z) of this subsection (1) for the construction, maintenance, repair, or installation of curbs, gutters, sidewalks, and related structures along residential and commercial streets or alleys and in residential or commercial subdivisions within the unincorporated areas of the county; except that, prior to making an assessment for any purpose authorized by this paragraph (y), the county shall consider cost-sharing alternatives so that a portion of the cost of any project authorized in this paragraph (y) is incurred and paid by the county;

To prescribe, by ordinance adopted, administered, and enforced in accordance with part 4 of article 15 of this title, the mode in which the charges on the respective owners of lots or lands, and on the lots or lands, shall be assessed and determined for the purposes authorized in paragraphs (u), (w), and (y) of this subsection (1);

To establish policies and procedures regarding entering into contracts binding on the county, and to delegate its power to enter into such contracts pursuant to such policies and procedures, where amounts specified in such policies and procedures and where such contracts otherwise comply with limits and requirements set forth in such policies and procedures;

To provide for the preservation of the cultural, historic, and architectural history within the county by ordinance or resolution; to delegate the power to designate historic landmarks and historic districts to an historic preservation advisory board; to accept dedicated or deeded easements or other historic property and to expend moneys for the maintenance of such deeded historic land, facilities, and structures; and to receive contributions, gifts, or other support from public and private entities to defray the maintenance costs of such historic land, facilities, and structures;

By resolution, memorial, plaque, or limited gift, to honor, commemorate, memorialize, or acknowledge outstanding service or other events, including death or retirement of individuals, or actions, accomplishments, or achievements deserving of recognition;

To enter into installment purchase contracts or shared-savings contracts or otherwise incur indebtedness under section 29-12.5-103, C.R.S., to finance energy conservation and energy saving measures and enter into contracts for an analysis and recommendations pertaining to such measures under section 29-12.5-102, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

To set, by written resolution duly adopted by a majority vote of the board and entered in its minutes prior to the county treasurer being sworn into office, the amount of a surety bond to be executed by the treasurer and to authorize the purchase of such a bond by the board;

To authorize the use of electronic records or signatures and adopt rules, standards, policies, and procedures for use of electronic records or signatures pursuant to article 71.3 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To establish an affordable housing dwelling unit advisory board for the county in accordance with the requirements of article 26 of title 29, C.R.S.;

To provide in the county budget for programs that support education and outreach on environmental sustainability and for financing capital improvements for energy efficiency retrofits and the installation of renewable energy fixtures, as defined in section 30-11-107.3, for private residences and commercial property within the county but that do not exempt the county from the requirements of any other statute;

To encourage homeowners to participate in utility demand-side management programs where applicable;

(I) To adopt a resolution to authorize, in consultation with the local board of health, local public health agencies, and any water and wastewater service providers serving the county, the use of graywater, as defined in section 25-8-103 (8.3), C.R.S., in compliance with any regulation adopted pursuant to section 25-8-205 (1)(g), C.R.S., and to enforce compliance with the board's resolution.

(II) Before adopting a resolution to authorize the use of graywater pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (kk), a board of county commissioners is encouraged to enter into a memorandum of understanding with the local board of health, local public health agencies, and any water and wastewater service providers serving the county concerning graywater usage and the proper installation and operation of graywater treatment works, as defined in section 25-8-103 (8.4), C.R.S.

To enter into loan agreements with any governmental entity that is created by or located within the county in accordance with section 30-25-106.5.

Subject to the provisions of part 1 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., the board of county commissioners of each county has exclusive power to adopt the annual budget for the operation of the county government, including all offices, departments, boards, commissions, other spending agencies of the county government, and other agencies which are funded in whole or in part by county appropriations. All such entities shall make appropriate budget recommendations each year to the board of county commissioners for the operation of their respective offices; but the final budget determination of each board of county commissioners shall be binding upon each of the respective offices, departments, boards, commissions, other spending agencies of the county government, and other agencies which are funded in whole or in part by county appropriations.

Every decision made by the board of county commissioners in exercising its budget-making power shall be presumed to be a valid exercise of the power granted by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

The board of county commissioners of any county eligible to receive impact assistance grants pursuant to part 3 of article 25 of this title may certify a dollar amount to the parks and wildlife commission pursuant to part 3 of article 25 of this title.

Source:

G.L.

§ 446.

G.S.

§ 538.

R.S. 08:

§ 1204.

C.L.

§ 8682.

CSA:

C. 45, § 25.

L. 45:

p. 296, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-7.

L. 55:

p. 250, § 1.

L. 57:

p. 313, § 1.

L. 61:

pp. 301, 714, §§ 1, 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-7.

L. 65:

pp. 458, 925, §§ 1, 5.

L. 69:

p. 225, § 1.

L. 77:

(1)(q) amended, p. 1439, § 1, effective May 26; (2) added, p. 1441, § 1, effective June 9; (1)(r) added, p. 1440, § 1, effective June 19; (1)(s) added, p. 1396, § 2, effective July 7; (1)(q) R&RE, p. 1285, § 3, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(3) added, p. 1154, § 2, effective June 22.

L. 80:

(1)(t) added, p. 655, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1)(u) added, p. 1448, § 1, effective June 12.

L. 82:

(1)(v) added, p. 427, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1)(w) added, p. 1235, § 1. effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(x) added, p. 806, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 86:

(1)(v) amended, p. 1040, § 4, effective April 30.

L. 90:

(1)(u) and (1)(w) amended and (1)(y) to (1)(cc) added, p. 1447, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(t) amended, p. 712, § 1, effective March 11; (1)(dd) added, p. 733, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 93:

(1)(ee) added, p. 346, § 4, effective April 12; (1)(o.5) added, p. 1255, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(ff) added, p. 500, § 3, effective May 16; (1)(o.5) repealed, p. 546, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 96:

(1)(d) amended, p. 347, § 3, effective April 17.

L. 97:

(1)(v) amended, p. 1245, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(ee) repealed, p. 825, § 40, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(1)(gg) added, p. 1348, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(f) amended, p. 265, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(1)(hh) added, p. 977, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(gg) amended, p. 858, § 7, effective May 30; (1)(m) amended, p. 1246, § 20, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(1)(ii) added, p. 1470, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(1)(x) amended, p. 1130, § 16, effective May 22; (1)(ii) amended and (1)(jj) added, p. 1293, § 5, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1204, § 10, effective June 4.

L. 2013:

(1) (kk) added, (HB 13-1044), ch. 228, p. 1089, § 4, effective May 15.

L. 2020:

(1)(ll) added, (SB 20-139), ch. 246, p. 1178, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(1)(x)(II) added by revision, (HB 22-1353), ch. 479, pp. 3498, 3499, §§ 8, 12.

Cross references:

(1) For additional powers of county commissioners relating to county airports, see part 1 of article 4 of title 41; for power of county commissioners to transfer county property for hospital purposes, see § 32-1-1003 (2); for power of a board to adopt ordinances for control or licensing of matters of purely local concern, see § 30-15-401; for the authority of the city and county of Denver to enter into a contract for teleconferencing facilities and services, see § 30-11-208.

(2) For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding subsection (1) (kk), see section 1 of chapter 228, Session Laws of Colorado 2013. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1353, see section 1 of chapter 479, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

30-11-107.3. Incentives for installation of renewable energy fixtures - definitions.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any county may offer an incentive, in the form of a county property tax or sales tax credit or rebate, to a residential or commercial property owner who installs a renewable energy fixture on his or her residential or commercial property.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"County" means any county or city and county.

"Renewable energy fixture" means any fixture, product, system, device, or interacting group of devices installed behind the meter of any residential or commercial building that produces energy from renewable resources, including, but not limited to, photovoltaic systems, solar thermal systems, small wind systems, biomass systems, or geothermal systems.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 488, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1294, § 6, effective May 27.

Cross references:

In 2007, this section was added by the "Renewable Energy Incentives Act". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 130, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

30-11-107.5. Lodging tax.

In accordance with the procedures set forth in this section, the board of county commissioners of each county, for one or more of the purposes specified in subsection (1.5) of this section, may levy a county lodging tax of not more than two percent on the purchase price paid or charged to persons for rooms or accommodations as included in the definition of "sale" in section 39-26-102 (11). No tax shall apply within any municipality levying a lodging tax.

(1.5) (a) Subject to the limitation set forth in subsection (1.5)(b) of this section, a county board of commissioners may levy the tax specified in subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of:

Advertising and marketing local tourism;

Housing and childcare for the tourism-related workforce, including seasonal workers, and for other workers in the community; or

Facilitating and enhancing visitor experiences.

If, after January 1, 2022, there is a new lodging tax created or the allowable uses of an existing lodging tax are expanded in accordance with subsection (3)(a.5) of this section, at least ten percent of the lodging tax revenue must be used for the purpose of advertising and marketing local tourism.

The county lodging tax shall be collected, administered, and enforced, to the extent feasible, pursuant to section 29-2-106, C.R.S.

The department of revenue shall perform, on an annual basis, an analysis to determine the net incremental cost of such collection, administration, and enforcement. The department of revenue shall retain only the amount determined to be necessary by the cost analysis, and in no event shall that amount exceed three and one-third percent of the amount collected. Such amount retained shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund, and such amount shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the net incremental cost of such collection, administration, and enforcement.

Any person or entity providing rooms or accommodations as included in the definition of "sale" referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be liable and responsible for the payment of an amount equivalent of up to two percent of all such sales made and shall quarterly, unless otherwise provided by law, make a return to the executive director of the department of revenue for the preceding tax-reporting period and remit an amount equivalent up to the said two percent on such sales to said executive director.

The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, approve a proposal for a county lodging tax; thereupon, such proposal for the county lodging tax shall be referred to the registered electors of the unincorporated areas and the municipalities subject to the lodging tax at a special election held for such purpose. Any such election may be combined with any other special election. On and after January 1, 1989, such tax may only be approved at a general election.

If, prior to January 1, 2022, the voters of a county approved a county lodging tax for the purpose of advertising and marketing local tourism, the board of county commissioners may, by resolution, approve a proposal to allow the county lodging tax revenues to also be used for any of the additional purposes specified in subsection (1.5) of this section. The county shall refer the proposal to the registered electors of the unincorporated areas and the municipalities subject to the lodging tax at the next general election.

A proposal for a county lodging tax under subsection (3)(a) of this section must contain a description of the proposed tax, must state the amount to be imposed, and must describe any municipality within the county that has such a tax and is therefore excluded from the election proposed in subsection (3)(a) of this section and any resulting lodging tax.

If any additional lodging tax or statewide tax on lodging facilities is enacted or levied after January 1, 1987, which in combination with the lodging tax authorized by this section exceeds two percent, the tax under this section shall be reduced by that amount that the total tax exceeds the two percent maximum specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Repealed.

No public moneys from any source shall be expended directly or indirectly to urge electors to vote in favor or against the imposition of the lodging tax. Nothing in this paragraph (d) shall be construed as prohibiting an elected official from expressing his personal opinion concerning the imposition of the lodging tax.

Upon the adoption of the resolution by the board of county commissioners approving a county lodging tax proposal in accordance with subsection (3)(a) or (3)(a.5) of this section, the county clerk and recorder shall publish the text of the proposal four separate times, a week apart, in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. The cost of the election must be initially paid out of the general fund of the county. If the county lodging tax is approved, the general fund of the county must be reimbursed out of the county lodging tax fund described in subsection (4)(a) of this section. The conduct of the election shall conform, so far as practicable, to the general election laws of the state.

If a proposal for a county lodging tax under subsection (3)(a) of this section is approved by a majority of the registered electors from the municipality or unincorporated area subject to the lodging tax voting thereon, the county lodging tax becomes effective as provided in section 29-2-106 (2). If a proposal to expand the allowable uses under subsection (3)(a.5) of this section is approved by a majority of the registered electors from the municipality or unincorporated area voting thereon, the county may also use the lodging tax revenue for any of the additional approved uses as specified in subsection (1.5) of this section.

If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon fail to approve the county lodging tax, the question shall not be submitted again to such electors for a period of one year following the date of said election.

If a county seeks to use lodging tax revenue for a purpose specified in subsection (1.5)(a)(II) or (1.5)(a)(III) of this section, then the ballot issue authorizing the use must specify how the county will spend the lodging tax revenue under either subsection.

All revenue collected from such county lodging tax, except the amounts retained under subsection (2) of this section, shall be credited to a special fund designated as the county lodging tax fund, hereby created. The fund shall be used only for the purposes approved by voters and to reimburse the general fund of the county for the cost of the election in accordance with subsection (3)(d) of this section. No revenue collected from such county lodging tax shall be used for any capital expenditures, with the exception of:

Capital expenditures for housing and childcare for the tourism-related workforce, including seasonal workers, and for other workers in the community;

Capital expenditures related to facilitating and enhancing visitor experiences; or

Tourist information centers.

Upon approval of a lodging tax for the purpose of advertising and marketing local tourism by the electors pursuant to this section, the county commissioners shall select a panel of no less than three citizens to administer the lodging tax fund; except that, if the money in the fund may also be used for any other purpose, then the panel shall only administer the portion of the fund that the board of county commissioners identifies as being available for advertising and marketing local tourism. The county commissioners shall appoint members from the tourism industry within the municipalities or unincorporated areas from which the lodging tax is collected. Where there is an established and proven marketing entity within the county formed for the purpose of advertising and marketing tourism, the panel is encouraged to use that entity, and that entity shall provide an accounting to the panel and to the county commissioners.

The panel, to the extent feasible, shall advertise and market tourism for the benefit of those unincorporated areas and municipalities from which the lodging tax originated.

Nothing provided in this section shall in any way prohibit municipalities and counties from cooperating to create countywide uniform lodging taxes with voluntary abandonment of municipal lodging tax ordinances.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1203, § 1, effective May 6; (3)(a) amended and (3)(c) repealed, p. 1207, §§ 1, 2, effective June 20.

L. 90:

(6) repealed, p. 1453, § 1, effective April 3.

L. 91:

(3)(b)(II) amended, p. 713, § 1, effective March 12.

L. 94:

(2)(b) amended, p. 317, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2022:

(1), (3)(b)(I), (3)(e), (3)(f)(I), (4)(a), and (4)(b) amended and (1.5), (3)(a.5), and (3)(g) added, (HB 22-1117), ch. 62, p. 315, § 4, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1117, see section 1 of chapter 62, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.